Colorado, session 2026A, HB1375.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal 26-1-121.5.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-8-111, repeal (3)
as follows:
25.5-8-111. Department - administration - outsourcing.
(3) If the state department uses county departments of human or
social services to perform functions relating to the administration of the
children's basic health plan pursuant to subsection (1)(a)(II) of this section
and allocates money to a county for that purpose, the state department shall
make the allocation in accordance with the results of the public assistance
programs funding model described in section 26-1-121.5.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26-1-121, repeal (2)(b)
as follows:
26-1-121. Appropriations - food distribution programs.
(2) (b) Beginning with fiscal year 2025-26, before making the
appropriation described in subsection (2)(a) of this section, the general
assembly shall consider, but is not required to appropriate amounts included
in, the results of the public assistance programs funding model described in
section 26-1-121.5.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26-1-122, amend (2)(a)
as follows:
26-1-122. County appropriations and expenditures -
advancements - procedures.
(2) (a) The county boards, in accordance with the rules of the state
department, shall file requests with the state department for advancement
of funds for the program costs of assistance payments, food stamps (except
the value of food stamp coupons), and social services and for the
administrative costs of each. The state department shall determine the
requirements of each county for program costs AND ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS,
taking into consideration available funds and all pertinent facts and
circumstances, and administrative costs, in accordance with the funding
model described in section 26-1-121.5, and shall certify by voucher to the
controller the amounts to be paid to each county. The amounts so certified
must be paid from the state treasury upon voucher of the state department
and warrant of the controller and must be credited by the county treasurer
to the county social services fund in accordance with the law and rules of
the state department.
SECTION 5. Appropriation - adjustments to 2026 long bill.
(1) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, to implement this
act, appropriations made in the annual general appropriation act for the
2026-27 state fiscal year to the department of human services for use by the
office of economic security for administration are adjusted as follows:
(a) The general fund appropriation is decreased by $180,000; and
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1375

(b) The reappropriated funds appropriation received from the
department of health care policy and financing is decreased by $240,000.
(2) The decrease of the appropriations in subsection (1) of this
section is based on the assumption that the anticipated amount of federal
funds received for the 2026-27 state fiscal year by the department of human
services for use by the office of economic security for administration will
decrease by $180,000.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, to
implement this act, appropriations made in the annual general appropriation
act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the department of health care policy
and financing for use by transfers to other state department
medicaid-funded programs for administration related to the office of
economic security are adjusted as follows:
(a) The general fund appropriation is decreased by $72,180, which
amount is subject to the "(M)" notation as defined in the general
appropriation act for the same fiscal year; and
(b) The cash funds appropriation from the healthcare affordability
and sustainability hospital provider fee cash fund created in section
25.5-4-402.4 (5)(a), C.R.S., is decreased by $47,820.
(4) The decrease of the appropriations in subsection (3) of this
section is based on the assumption that the anticipated amount of federal
funds received for the 2026-27 state fiscal year by the department of health
care policy and financing for use by transfers to other state department
medicaid-funded programs for administration related to the office of
economic security will decrease by $120,000.
(5) Subsection (1) of this section does not require a reduction of an
appropriation in the annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state
fiscal year if:
(a) The amount of the general fund appropriation made in the annual
general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the department
of human services for use by the office of economic security for
administration is less than the amount of the adjustment required in
subsection (1)(a) of this section; or
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1375

(b) The amount of the reappropriated funds appropriation received
from the department of health care policy and financing made in the annual
general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the department
of human services for use by the office of economic security for
administration is less than the amount of the adjustment required in
subsection (1)(b) of this section; or
(c) The annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal
year does not include an appropriation to the department of human services
for use by the office of economic security for administration.
(6) Subsection (3) of this section does not require a reduction of an
appropriation in the annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state
fiscal year if:
(a) The amount of the general fund appropriation made in the annual
general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the department
of health care policy and financing for use by transfers to other state
department medicaid-funded programs for administration related to the
office of economic security is less than the amount of the adjustment
required in subsection (3)(a) of this section; or
(b) The amount of the cash funds appropriation from the healthcare
affordability and sustainability hospital provider fee cash fund created in
section 25.5-4-402.4 (5)(a), C.R.S., in the annual general appropriation act
for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the department of health care policy and
financing for use by transfers to other state department medicaid-funded
programs for administration related to the office of economic security is less
than the amount of the adjustment required in subsection (3)(b) of this
section; or
(c) The annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal
year does not include an appropriation to the department of health care
policy and financing for use by transfers to other state department
medicaid-funded programs for administration related to the office of
economic security.
SECTION 6. Effective date. This act takes effect upon passage;
except that section 5 of this act takes effect only if the annual general
appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year becomes law, in which
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1375

case section 5 takes effect upon the effective date of this act or of the annual
general appropriation act for state fiscal year 2026-27, whichever is later.
SECTION 7. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1375